District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-459

Rules.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, § 501, 34 DCR 689
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(j), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-459.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(d) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
Delegation of authority under Law 6-209, see Mayor’s Order 87-104, April 23, 1987.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”